bg-BG: Материал на корпуса на косачката: Алуминий; Композит; Изработена стомана; Пластмаса; Щампована стомана; Друго
sv: Klippaggregatets material: Aluminium; Sammansatt; Tillverkat stål; Plast; Stamped stål; Övrigt
hu: Fűnyíródeck anyaga: Alumínium; Kompozit; Gyártott acél; Műanyag; Préselt acél; Egyéb
nl: Materiaal van maaidek: Aluminium; Composiet; Gefabriceerd staal; Plastic; Gestanst staal; Overig
zh-TW: 割草機底盤材質: 鋁; 複合; 加工鋼; 塑膠; 沖壓鋼; 其他
el: Υλικό καταστρώματος χλοοκοπτικού: Αλουμίνιο; Σύνθετο υλικό; Κατασκευασμένο χάλυβα; Πλαστικό; Σφραγισμένος χάλυβας; Άλλο
vi: Vật liệu sàn cắt của máy cắt cỏ: Nhôm; Tổng hợp; Thép gia công; Nhựa; Thép dập; Khác
da: Klippeaggregats materiale: Aluminium; Komposit; Fremstillet stål; Plast; Stanset stål; Andet
pl: Materiał obudowy kosiarki: Aluminium; Kompozyt; Stal spawana; Tworzywo sztuczne; Stal tłoczona; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Material plošče kosilnice: Aluminij; Kompozit; Jeklene konstrukcije; Plastika; Stamped jeklo; Druga
pt-PT: Material da plataforma de corte: Alumínio; Composto; Aço fabricado; Plástico; Aço estampado; Outro
fr: Matériau du carter de tondeuse: Aluminum; Composite; Acier fabriqué; Plastique; Acier embouti; Autre
ro-RO: Materialul platformei de tăiere: Aluminiu; Compozit; Oțel fabricat; Plastic; Oțel ștanțat; Altele
zh-CN: 割草机底盘材质: 铝; 复合材料; 制造钢板; 塑料; 冲压钢板; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál žacieho ústrojenstva: Hliník; Kompozit; Zváraná oceľ; Plast; Stamped oceľ; Iné
it: Materiale del piatto di taglio: Alluminio; Composito; Acciaio lavorato; Plastica; Acciaio Stamped; Altro
tr: Çim biçme makinesi tabla malzemesi: Alüminyum; Kompozit; İşlenmiş çelik; Plastik; Preslenmiş çelik; Diğer
lt-LT: Vejapjovės pjovimo denio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Kompozitas; Apdorotas plienas; Plastikas; Presuotas plienas; Kita
es: Material de la carcasa del cortacésped: Aluminio; Compuesto; Acero fabricado; Plástico; Acero estampado; Otros
nb: Materiale til klippeaggregat: Aluminium; Kompositt; Fabrikert stål; Plast; Stamped stål; Annet
fi: Leikkuulaitteen materiaali: Alumiini; Komposiitti; Hitsattu teräs; Muovi; Puristettu teräs; Muu
pt-BR: Material da plataforma do cortador: Alumínio; Composto; Aço fabricado; Plástico; Aço estampado; Outro
ru: Материал деки газонокосилки: Алюминий; Композит; Сварная сталь; Пластик; Штампованная сталь; Другой
ja: 芝刈り機のデッキ材質: アルミニウム; 複合; 加工鋼; プラスチック; スタンプ加工鋼; その他
ko: 잔디깎기 데크 재질: 알루미늄; 복합물; 용접 조립; 플라스틱; 프레스 성형; 기타
hr-HR: Materijal kosilice: Aluminij; Kompozit; Prerađeni čelik; Plastika; Prešani čelik; Ostalo
cs: Materiál žacího ústrojí: Hliník; Kompozit; Svařovaná ocel; Plast; Lisovaná ocel; Jiné
en: Mower deck material: Aluminum; Composite; Fabricated steel; Plastic; Stamped steel; Other
th: วัสดุของแท่นตัดหญ้า: อะลูมิเนียม; วัสดุคอมโพสิต; เหล็กเชื่อมประกอบ; พลาสติก; เหล็กปั๊มขึ้นรูป; อื่นๆ
de: Material des Mähdecks: Aluminium; Zusammengesetzt; Gefertigter Stahl; Kunststoff; Gestanzter Stahl; Sonstiges